Massachusetts, session 194th, H1772.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 304 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subdivision (7) and adding in place thereof
the following subdivisions:-
(7) the person’s legal counsel, if counsel is retained by the person.
(8) any other person as directed by the court.
SECTION 2. Section 304 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding the following subsection:
of 2

(e) The notice shall inform the person alleged to be incapacitated or person to be
protected of their legal rights, including the right to legal representation and the right to be
present at any and all hearings in person.
SECTION 3. Section 305 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subdivision (3) of subsection (c) and
inserting in place the following subdivision:-
(3) any other person the court deems appropriate who is certified as a national certified
guardian by the center for guardianship commission within 6 months after his or her
appointment.
SECTION 4. Section 309 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “decision-making” in line 36 the
following words:
“, as well as related expenses charged by the guardian to the incapacitated person’s
estate;”
of 2